Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-9302
Act; purpose; applicability of provisions.

(1) The purpose of the Travel Insurance Act is to promote the public welfare by creating a comprehensive legal framework within which travel insurance may be sold in this state.

(2) The requirements of the Travel Insurance Act shall apply to travel insurance that covers any resident of this state or that is sold, solicited, negotiated, or offered in this state and to policies and certificates of travel insurance that are delivered or issued for delivery in this state. The act shall not apply to cancellation fee waivers or travel assistance services except as expressly provided in the act.

(3) All other applicable provisions of the insurance laws of this state shall continue to apply to travel insurance, except that the specific provisions of the Travel Insurance Act shall supersede any general provisions of law that would otherwise be applicable to travel insurance.

Laws 2022, LB863, § 2.